Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE D. PREVENTION, CONTROL, AND REPORTS OF DISEASES; PUBLIC HEALTH DISASTERS AND EMERGENCIES

CHAPTER 100A. UTERINE FIBROID EDUCATION AND RESEARCH

Sec. 100A.001. UTERINE FIBROID DATABASE. (a) Using available data collected by the department under Chapter 108, the department's Center for Health Statistics shall establish and maintain an electronic database of information related to uterine fibroids to increase awareness about uterine fibroids and ensure women receive the information and health care necessary to prevent and treat the condition. The database must include the:

(1) demographic attributes of women diagnosed with uterine fibroids; and

(2) treatments for uterine fibroids used by health care providers.

(b) Information regarding a woman who is diagnosed with or treated for uterine fibroids that is collected by the department and maintained in the database under Subsection (a):

(1) may not include any personally identifying information of the woman; and

(2) is confidential and may be used only by the department or other person on behalf of the department for uterine fibroid research.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 480 (H.B. 1967), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 100A.002. UTERINE FIBROID EDUCATION. The department, in consultation with the Texas Medical Association, shall identify and post on the department's Internet website existing resources and educational materials on uterine fibroids to increase public awareness of uterine fibroids, including information on and awareness of the:

(1) women of a race or ethnicity that has a statistically elevated risk of developing uterine fibroids; and

(2) range of available treatment options for uterine fibroids that include non-hysterectomy treatments and procedures.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 480 (H.B. 1967), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.